Kentucky, session 2026RS, SB108.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the Commonwealth of Kentucky:
SECTION 1. A NEW SECTION OF KRS 344.030 TO 344.110 IS CREATED
TO READ AS FOLLOWS:
(1) An employer that requires an employee, as a condition of employment, to be
immunized against disease shall:
(a) Grant an exception to any employee for a sincerely held religious belief
against immunization;
(b) Grant an exception to any employee for whom, in the written opinion of a
health care provider, the required immunization would be injurious to his
or her health; and
(c) Provide notice of the required immunization to each employee in a written
document that:
1. Advises in plain language the available exemptions from the required
immunization for a sincerely held religious belief or medical
contraindication; and
2. Requires each employee to acknowledge, in writing, receipt of the
requirement and receipt of the available exemptions.
(2) An employer may require an employee to swear or affirm the claimed exemption
on a form that substantially complies with the following:
"I, [employee name], swear or affirm by my signature below that I:
..........Hold a sincere religious belief against receiving immunization
against disease.
.........Object to the immunization as the required immunization would
be injurious to my health.
[Employee signature] ......................................... [Date]............................".
(3) Additional evidence or documentation of an employee's sincerely held religious
Page 1 of 10
XXXX 1/14/2026 9:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1773
belief shall not be required.
(4) A written opinion from a health care provider that the required immunization
would be injurious to the employee's health shall be the only documentation
required for an employee's claimed health exemption.
(5) (a) Any person injured by any act in violation of this section shall have a civil
cause of action in Circuit Court to:
1. Enjoin further violations;
2. Recover the actual damages sustained, including reasonable
attorney's fees, together with the costs of the action; and
3. Recover punitive damages.
(b) Notwithstanding the provisions of KRS 342.690, an employee who suffers
an adverse reaction to an immunization required as a condition of his or
her employment may claim compensation under KRS Chapter 342 and may
maintain a civil cause of action as provided under paragraph (a) of this
section, provided:
1. The amount of compensation paid under KRS Chapter 342 shall be
credited against the amount received in the civil action; and
2. If the amount of compensation paid under KRS Chapter 342 is larger
than the amount received in the civil action, the amount of damages
less the employee's legal fees, costs, and expenses in the civil action
shall be credited against the amount of compensation.
Section 2. KRS 344.030 is amended to read as follows:
As used in[For the purposes of] KRS 344.030 to 344.110:
(1) "Because of sex" and "on the basis of sex" includes but is not limited to because
of or on the basis of pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions, and
women affected by pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions shall be
treated the same for all employment-related purposes, including receipt of
Page 2 of 10
XXXX 1/14/2026 9:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1773
benefits under fringe benefit programs, as other persons not so affected but
similar in their ability or inability to work["Qualified individual with a disability"
means an individual with a disability as defined in KRS 344.010 who, with or
without reasonable accommodation, can perform the essential functions of the
employment position that the individual holds or desires unless an employer
demonstrates that he is unable to reasonably accommodate an employee's or
prospective employee's disability without undue hardship on the conduct of the
employers' business. Consideration shall be given to the employer's judgment as to
what functions of a job are essential, and if an employer has prepared a written
description before advertising or interviewing applicants for the job, this description
shall be considered evidence of the essential functions of the job];
(2) (a) "Employee" means an individual employed by an employer, but does not
include an individual employed by his parents, spouse, or child, or an
individual employed to render services as a domestic in the home of the
employer.
(b) Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the United
States Department of Labor and a franchisee, neither a franchisee nor a
franchisee's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the franchisor
for any purpose under this chapter.
(c) Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the United
States Department of Labor and a franchisor, neither a franchisor nor a
franchisor's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the franchisee
for any purpose under this chapter.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "franchisee" and "franchisor" have the
same meanings as in 16 C.F.R. sec. 436.1;
(3) "Employer" means a person who has eight (8) or more employees within the state in
each of twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in the current or preceding calendar
Page 3 of 10
XXXX 1/14/2026 9:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1773
year and an agent of such a person, except for purposes of determining
accommodations for an employee's own limitations related to her pregnancy,
childbirth, or related medical conditions, employer means a person who has fifteen
(15) or more employees within the state in each of twenty (20) or more calendar
weeks in the current or preceding calendar year and any agent of the person, and,
except for purposes of determining discrimination based on disability, employer
means a person engaged in an industry affecting commerce who has fifteen (15) or
more employees for each working day in each of twenty (20) or more calendar
weeks in the current or preceding calendar year, and any agent of that person,
except that, for two (2) years following July 14, 1992, an employer means a person
engaged in an industry affecting commerce who has twenty-five (25) or more
employees for each working day in each of twenty (20) or more calendar weeks in
the current or preceding year, and any agent of that person. For the purposes of
determining discrimination based on disability, employer shall not include:
(a) The United States, a corporation wholly owned by the government of the
United States, or an Indian tribe; or
(b) A bona fide private membership club (other than a labor organization) that is
exempt from taxation under Section 501(c) of the Internal Revenue Service
Code of 1986;
(4)[(3)] "Employment agency" means a person regularly undertaking with or without
compensation to procure employees for an employer or to procure for employees
opportunities to work for an employer and includes an agent of such person;
(5) "Health care provider" means:
(a) An advanced practice registered nurse licensed under KRS Chapter 314;
(b) A pharmacist licensed under KRS Chapter 315;
(c) A physician or osteopath licensed under KRS Chapter 311; or
(d) A physician assistant licensed under KRS 311.840 to 311.862;
Page 4 of 10
XXXX 1/14/2026 9:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1773
(6)[(4)] "Labor organization" means a labor organization and an agent of such an
organization, and includes an organization of any kind, an agency or employee
representation committee, group, association, or plan so engaged in which
employees participate and which exists for the purpose, in whole or in part, of
dealing with employers concerning grievances, labor disputes, wages, rates of pay,
hours, or other terms or conditions of employment, and a conference, general
committee, joint or system board, or joint council so engaged which is subordinate
to a national or international labor organization;[
(5) (a) "Employee" means an individual employed by an employer, but does
not include an individual employed by his parents, spouse, or child, or an
individual employed to render services as a domestic in the home of the
employer.
(b) Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the United
States Department of Labor and a franchisee, neither a franchisee nor a
franchisee's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the franchisor for
any purpose under this chapter.
(c) Notwithstanding any voluntary agreement entered into between the United
States Department of Labor and a franchisor, neither a franchisor nor a
franchisor's employee shall be deemed to be an employee of the franchisee for
any purpose under this chapter.
(d) For purposes of this subsection, "franchisee" and "franchisor" have the same
meanings as in 16 C.F.R. sec. 436.1;]
(7)[(6)] "Qualified individual with a disability" means an individual with a
disability as defined in KRS 344.010 who, with or without reasonable
accommodation, can perform the essential functions of the employment position
that the individual holds or desires unless an employer demonstrates that he is
unable to reasonably accommodate an employee's or prospective employee's
Page 5 of 10
XXXX 1/14/2026 9:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1773
disability without undue hardship on the conduct of the employers' business.
Consideration shall be given to the employer's judgment as to what functions of a
job are essential, and if an employer has prepared a written description before
advertising or interviewing applicants for the job, this description shall be
considered evidence of the essential functions of the job;
(8) "Reasonable accommodation":
(a) Means making existing facilities used by employees readily accessible to and
usable by individuals with disabilities, job restructuring, part-time or modified
work schedules, reassignment to a vacant position, acquisition or modification
of equipment or devices, appropriate adjustment or modifications of
examinations, training materials or policies, the provision of qualified readers
or interpreters, and other similar accommodations for individuals with
disabilities; and
(b) For an employee's own limitations related to her pregnancy, childbirth, or
related medical conditions, may include more frequent or longer breaks, time
off to recover from childbirth, acquisition or modification of equipment,
appropriate seating, temporary transfer to a less strenuous or less hazardous
position, job restructuring, light duty, modified work schedule, and private
space that is not a bathroom for expressing breast milk;
(9) "Related medical condition" includes but is not limited to lactation or the need to
express breast milk for a nursing child and has the same meaning as that term is
referenced in the Pregnancy Discrimination Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 2000e(k), and
shall be construed as that term has been construed under that Act;
(10)[(7)] "Religion" means all aspects of religious observance and practice, as well as
belief, unless an employer demonstrates that he is unable to reasonably
accommodate to an employee's or prospective employee's religious observance or
practice without undue hardship on the conduct of the employer's business[;
Page 6 of 10
XXXX 1/14/2026 9:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1773
(8) (a) The terms "because of sex" and "on the basis of sex" include but are not
limited to because of or on the basis of pregnancy, childbirth, or related
medical conditions, and women affected by pregnancy, childbirth, or related
medical conditions shall be treated the same for all employment-related
purposes, including receipt of benefits under fringe benefit programs, as other
persons not so affected but similar in their ability or inability to work.
(b) "Related medical condition" includes but is not limited to lactation or the need
to express breast milk for a nursing child and has the same meaning as in the
Pregnancy Discrimination Act, 42 U.S.C. sec. 2000e(k), and shall be
construed as that term has been construed under that Act]; and
(11)[(9)] "Undue hardship," for purposes of disability discrimination or limitations due
to pregnancy, childbirth, or related medical conditions as described in KRS
344.040(1)(c), means an action requiring significant difficulty or expense, when
considered in light of the following factors:
(a) The nature and cost of the accommodation needed;
(b) The overall financial resources of the facility or facilities involved in the
provision of the reasonable accommodation; the number of persons employed
at the facility; the effect on expenses and resources; or the impact otherwise of
such accommodation upon the operation of the facility;
(c) The overall financial resources of the covered entity; the overall size of the
business of a covered entity with respect to the number of its employees; and
the number, type, and location of its facilities;
(d) The type of operation or operations of the covered entity, including the
composition, structure, and functions of the workforce of such entity; the
geographic separateness, administrative, or fiscal relationship of the facility or
facilities in question to the covered entity; and
(e) In addition to paragraphs (a) to (d) of this subsection, for pregnancy,
Page 7 of 10
XXXX 1/14/2026 9:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1773
childbirth, and related medical conditions, the following factors:
1. The duration of the requested accommodation; and
2. Whether similar accommodations are required by policy to be made,
have been made, or are being made for other employees due to any
reason.
Section 3. KRS 344.040 is amended to read as follows:
(1) It is an unlawful practice for an employer:
(a) To fail or refuse to hire, or to discharge any individual, or otherwise to
discriminate against an individual with respect to compensation, terms,
conditions, or privileges of employment, because of the individual's race,
color, religion, national origin, sex, age forty (40) and over, because the
person is a qualified individual with a disability, or because the individual is a
smoker or nonsmoker, as long as the person complies with any workplace
policy concerning smoking;
(b) To limit, segregate, or classify employees in any way which would deprive or
tend to deprive an individual of employment opportunities or otherwise
adversely affect status as an employee, because of the individual's race, color,
religion, national origin, sex, or age forty (40) and over, because the person is
a qualified individual with a disability, or because the individual is a smoker
or nonsmoker, as long as the person complies with any workplace policy
concerning smoking;
(c) To fail to make reasonable accommodations for any employee with
limitations related to pregnancy, childbirth, or a related medical condition
who requests an accommodation, including but not limited to the need to
express breast milk, unless the employer can demonstrate the accommodation
would impose an undue hardship on the employer's program, enterprise, or
business. The following shall be required as to reasonable accommodations:
Page 8 of 10
XXXX 1/14/2026 9:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1773
1. An employee shall not be required to take leave from work if another
reasonable accommodation can be provided;
2. The employer and employee shall engage in a timely, good faith, and
interactive process to determine effective reasonable accommodations;
and
3. If the employer has a policy to provide, would be required to provide, is
currently providing, or has provided a similar accommodation to other
classes of employees, then a rebuttable presumption is created that the
accommodation does not impose an undue hardship on the employer;[
or]
(d) To require as a condition of employment that any employee or applicant for
employment abstain from smoking or using tobacco products outside the
course of employment, as long as the person complies with any workplace
policy concerning smoking; or
(e) To require as a condition of employment that any employee be immunized
against disease if that employee has:
1. A sincerely held religious belief against immunization; or
2. Received the written opinion of a health care provider that the
required immunization would be injurious to his or her health.
(2) (a) A difference in employee contribution rates for smokers and nonsmokers in
relation to an employer-sponsored health plan shall not be deemed to be an
unlawful practice in violation of this section.
(b) The offering of incentives or benefits offered by an employer to employees
who participate in a smoking cessation program shall not be deemed to be an
unlawful practice in violation of this section.
(3) (a) An employer shall provide written notice of the right to be free from
discrimination in relation to pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical
Page 9 of 10
XXXX 1/14/2026 9:24 AM Jacketed

UNOFFICIAL COPY 26 RS BR 1773
conditions, including the right to reasonable accommodations, to [:
1. ]new employees at the commencement of employment[; and
2. Existing employees not later than thirty (30) days after June 27, 2019].
(b) An employer shall conspicuously post a written notice of the right to be free
from discrimination in relation to pregnancy, childbirth, and related medical
conditions, including the right to reasonable accommodations, at the
employer's place of business in an area accessible to employees.
Page 10 of 10
XXXX 1/14/2026 9:24 AM Jacketed